Washington statutes.
RCW 36.61.070

Creation of district—Submittal of question to landowners.

(1) After the public hearing, the county legislative authority may adopt a resolution submitting the question of creating the lake or beach management district to the owners of land within the proposed lake or beach management district, including publicly owned land, if the county legislative authority finds that it is in the public interest to create the lake or beach management district and the financing of the lake or beach improvement and maintenance activities is feasible. The resolution shall also include: (a) A plan describing the proposed lake or beach improvement and maintenance activities which avoid adverse impacts on fish and wildlife and provide for appropriate measures to protect and enhance fish and wildlife; (b) the number of years the lake or beach management district will exist; (c) the amount to be raised by special assessments or rates and charges; (d) if special assessments are to be imposed, whether the special assessments shall be imposed annually for the duration of the lake or beach management district or only once with the possibility of installments being imposed and lake or beach management bonds being issued, or both, and, if both types of special assessments are proposed to be imposed, the lake or beach improvement or maintenance activities proposed to be financed by each type of special assessment; (e) if rates and charges are to be imposed, a description of the proposed rates and charges and the possibility of revenue bonds being issued that are payable from the rates and charges; and (f) the estimated special assessment or rate and charge proposed to be imposed on each parcel included in the proposed lake or beach management district.

(2) No lake or beach management district may be created by a county that includes territory located in another county without the approval of the legislative authority of the other county.

[ 2014 c 85 s 4; 2008 c 301 s 9; 1987 c 432 s 5; 1985 c 398 s 6.]